Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2965
Meetings and notice.

(1) Unless otherwise provided by the articles of organization or bylaws, the board of directors may establish a time and place for regular board meetings and notice of the time, place, or purpose of those meetings is not required.

(2) Unless otherwise provided by the articles of organization or bylaws, special meetings of the board of directors shall be preceded by at least three days' notice of the time, date, and place of the meeting. The notice shall contain a statement of the purpose of the special meeting and the meeting shall be limited to the matters contained in the statement.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 65.